Utah statutes.
63G-7-402.   Time for filing notice of claim.

A claim against a governmental entity, or against an employee for an act or omission occurring during the performance of the employee's duties, within the scope of employment, or under color of authority, is barred unless notice of claim is filed with the person and according to the requirements of Section 63G-7-401 within one year after the claim arises regardless of whether or not the function giving rise to the claim is characterized as governmental.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

